California statutes. Water Code
The full amount of the authorized bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates fixed for the bonds of each series. The maximum term which the bonds of any series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 40 years from the date of the series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71952.

The board shall, by resolution, prescribe the form of the bonds and of the coupons attached thereto and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable. The payment of the first installment of principal may be deferred for a period of not more than five years from the date of the bonds or the date of the bonds of each series respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71953.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not to exceed 8 percent per year, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year may be payable at the end of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

71954.

The board may provide for the call and redemption of bonds prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as it may specify. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71955.

The denomination of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance but shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71956.

The principal and interest on the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district or such other place or places as may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holder of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71957.

The bonds shall be dated, numbered consecutively, signed by the president and treasurer of the district, countersigned by the secretary, and the official seal of the district attached. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the treasurer of the district. All such signatures and countersignatures may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures or countersignatures to the bonds shall be manually affixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71958.

If the bond election proceedings have been limited to and have applied only to an improvement district, the bonds are bonds of the district, shall be issued in the name of the district, and shall be designated “Bonds of ____ Municipal Water District for Improvement District No. ____.” Each bond and all interest coupons thereof shall state that taxes levied for the payment thereof will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71959.

Any bonds issued by a district have the same force, value, and use as bonds issued by a city and are exempt from all taxation within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71960.

The board may, without a vote of the electors, provide for the issuance of, and issue, general obligation bonds of the district or for an improvement district thereof if:

(a) The principal amount of such bonds do not exceed the then unissued balance of the principal amount of bonds authorized at an election held in the district, or in such improvement district, prior to May 9, 1967;

(b) The bonds are issued for the same purpose as that for which said unissued bonds were authorized; and

(c) The bonds are issued in accordance with the provisions of this article, except for the requirement of a bond election.

Bonds issued pursuant to this section may bear interest at a rate or rates not to exceed 8 percent per year, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year may be payable at the end of that year. When bonds are issued pursuant to this section, unissued bonds as referred to in (a) and (b) above in a principal amount at least equal to the principal amount of bonds issued pursuant to this section, shall be canceled by order of the board and shall not be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale of Bonds and Use of Proceeds [71970. - 71975.]

71970.

Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, it may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71971.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be paid into the treasury of the district, placed to the credit of a special improvement fund, and expended only for the purpose for which the indebtedness was created. When such purpose has been accomplished, any moneys remaining in the special improvement fund may be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71972.

Any moneys remaining in the special improvement fund from the sale of bonds of the district after the purpose for which the indebtedness was created has been accomplished may also be used for any other municipal water district purpose. Such moneys remaining from the sale of bonds of the district for an improvement district therein may also be used for any purpose which will benefit the property in the improvement district.

Such moneys may not be used for such other municipal water district purpose or improvement district purpose until two-thirds of the qualified voters of the district or improvement district have consented thereto at a special election called in the district or improvement district by the board. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner provided for bond elections in the district or improvement district, as the case may be, and in other respects the election shall be conducted as are other district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71973.

Interest on any bonds issued by the district coming due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy after the sale of the bonds are available, and interest on any bonds issued by the district coming due before the expiration of one year following completion of the acquisition and construction of the works and improvements for which the bonds were issued may be paid from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

71974.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds of the district issued for an improvement district thereof may be expended for the purpose for which the indebtedness was created in any territory annexed to the improvement district after the authorization of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71975.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, within the Rainbow Municipal Water District, if bonds have been authorized or issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71920) of this part, and thereafter, due to a change in conditions or circumstances, the board determines that the improvement, generally described in the resolution of intention No. 438, adopted October 27, 1969, pursuant to Section 71924, should be significantly modified, the board by resolution may so modify such improvement and may issue authorized but unissued bonds or, to the extent the rights of bondholders are not impaired, expend the proceeds of bonds issued for the purpose of paying the cost of the improvement as modified, without any further election or without taking proceedings pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71920) of this part, provided that such modification shall not change the purpose for which the sale of bonds was originally authorized, and only after notice and hearing in the same manner as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 71880) of Chapter 3 of this part and Article 6 (commencing with Section 53520) of Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, and provided that at the conclusion of the hearing the board, four-fifths of the members concurring, shall by resolution determine that the territory within the improvement district will be benefited by the improvement as modified. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the board, by resolution, may make minor modifications in the plans for the acquisition and construction of improvements and the determination made in such resolution shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Formation of Improvement Districts for Issuance of Revenue Bonds [71980. - 71996.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiation of Proceedings [71980. - 71985.]

71980.

Whenever the board deems it necessary to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, completion, or repair of any or all improvements, works or property mentioned in this division, and to provide for such bonded indebtedness payable exclusively from the revenues of an enterprise acquired, constructed, improved or financed for the benefit of an area less than all of the district, the board shall, by resolution, declare its intention to form a revenue improvement district and to incur such indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71981.

The resolution of intention shall state that the board intends to form a revenue improvement district of a portion of the district which in the opinion of the board will be benefited, and to call an election in such proposed revenue improvement district, on a date to be fixed, for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of revenue bonds of the district for such revenue improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71982.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred and a general description of the enterprise.

(b) The estimated amount of debt to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(c) That the bonds are to be revenue bonds, and shall be payable exclusively from the revenues of the enterprise within such revenue improvement district and that the bonds are not to be secured by the taxing power of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71983.

The resolution of intention shall also state that a general description of the proposed enterprise, together with a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed revenue improvement district with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto and to the proposed enterprise is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. This map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed revenue improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71984.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the formation and extent of the proposed revenue improvement district and the proposed enterprise.

(b) That at the time and place specified in the resolution any person interested including all persons owning property in the district or in the proposed revenue improvement district, will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71985.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention in six public places within the proposed revenue improvement district at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Changes [71986. - 71986.]

71986.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the board shall proceed with the hearing, conduct the hearing, make changes to the enterprise or the estimated amount of the proposed debt and hold hearings on the changes pursuant to Sections 71880 to 71883, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Formation of Revenue Improvement District [71987. - 71990.]

71987.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether it is deemed necessary to form the proposed revenue improvement district and to incur the bonded indebtedness. If so, the resolution shall state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(b) The estimated amount of the proposed debt.

(c) That the exterior boundaries of the portion of the district which will be benefited are set forth on a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the revenue improvement district.

(d) That such portion of the district set forth on the map shall thereupon be formed and be known as “Revenue Improvement District No. ____ of ____ Municipal Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71988.

The determinations made in the resolution of formation shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71989.

After the formation of the revenue improvement district pursuant to this chapter, all proceedings for the purpose of a revenue bond election by the revenue improvement district shall be limited, and shall apply only to the revenue improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71990.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, after the formation of the improvement district pursuant to this chapter, the improvement district shall be a local agency for the purposes of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 and the terms defined in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall have the meaning therein set forth unless the context requires a different meaning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Calling of Revenue Bond Election [71991. - 71994.]

71991.

After the board has made its determination of the matters required to be determined by the resolution of formation, and if the board deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, the board shall, by a further resolution, call a special election in the revenue improvement district for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of revenue bonds of the district for the revenue improvement district. The election shall be held and the votes canvassed pursuant to law for municipal water district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71992.

The resolution calling the revenue bond election shall be adopted, contain the statement, be published and provide for issuance of the revenue bonds in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380 of the Government Code) of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, except as otherwise required by law and this chapter, and, in addition, the resolution shall state:

(a) That the board deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness.

(b) The revenue improvement district to be benefited by the bonded indebtedness, as set forth in the resolution of formation of the revenue improvement district, and that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the revenue improvement district is on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the revenue improvement district.

(c) That the votes of a majority of all voters voting on the proposition are required to authorize the issuance of the revenue bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71993.

If the issuance of the revenue bonds is authorized at the election, the board shall provide for their issuance, sale, authentication, form and redemption in the manner provided in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71994.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this article shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, the powers and duties of the revenue improvement district as a local agency under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, except that where this chapter is inconsistent with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 is controlling. The municipal water district may do any act for or on behalf of the revenue improvement district authorized by law and the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or in derogation of the security of the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Advance of Funds [71995. - 71996.]

71995.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish the purposes of a revenue improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

71996.

The board may repay the district for any advance of funds from the proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds authorized for the purposes of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 229.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. FORMATION OF IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN ISSUANCE OF BONDS [72000. - 72077.]



  CHAPTER 1. Initiation of Proceedings [72000. - 72004.]

72000.

Whenever the board deems it necessary to form an improvement district of a portion of the district for a purpose other than the incurring of bonded indebtedness, the board shall by resolution declare that it intends to form an improvement district of a portion of the district which in its opinion will be benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72001.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed improvement district is to be formed. 

(b) The estimated expense of carrying out such purpose.

(c) That taxes for carrying out such purpose will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72002.

The resolution of intention shall also state that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed improvement district, with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto, is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. This map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72003.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the formation and extent of the proposed improvement district, the purpose for which it is to be formed, and the estimated expense of carrying out such purpose.

(b) That at such time and place any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district or in the proposed improvement district, will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72004.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper circulated in the municipal water district, if there is a newspaper circulated in the district. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention, in three public places within the proposed improvement district for at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hearing and Adoption of Resolution of Formation [72010. - 72014.]

72010.

At the time and place so fixed in the resolution of intention, or at any time or place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing any person interested, including any person owning property in the district, or in the proposed improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72011.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether it is necessary to form the improvement district. If so, the resolution shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed improvement district is to be formed. 

(b) The estimated expense of carrying out such purpose.

(c) That the exterior boundaries of the portion of the district which will be benefited are set forth on a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the improvement district.

(d) That such portion of the district set forth on the map, shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District (A, B, C, or other letter designation)____ of ____ Municipal Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72012.

The determinations made in the resolution of formation shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72013.

After the formation of the improvement district pursuant to this part, all taxes levied for the carrying out of its purpose shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72014.

A copy of the resolution of formation shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. A copy of the resolution shall also be posted in three public places within the proposed improvement district for at least two weeks.

The resolution of formation shall not be effective until the 31st day after completion of the publication and posting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Formation Election [72020. - 72027.]

72020.

If a petition signed by not less than 10 percent of the voters of the proposed improvement district requesting that an election be held on the formation thereof is presented to the board before the effective date of the resolution of formation, the board shall by resolution call a special election in the proposed improvement district for the purpose of submitting the question of the formation of the improvement district to the voters of the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72020.5.

In addition to the provisions of Section 72020, in the Casitas Municipal Water District, the board may by resolution call a special election in the proposed improvement district for the purpose of submitting the question of the formation of the improvement district to the voters of the proposed improvement district. This special provision for Casitas Municipal Water District is necessary because the Legislature recognizes that certain proposed improvement districts in the Casitas Municipal Water District are controversial, that an election should be called, and that to require a petition to be circulated for recognized controversial improvement districts would constitute an unnecessary hardship. This problem is not common to all districts formed under this division. It is therefore hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this section as a special law is necessary for the solution of problems existing in the Casitas Municipal Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1273.)
-------------------------------------------

72021.

The board shall provide for holding the special election on the day fixed in the resolution calling the election and in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code so far as they shall be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72022.

Notice of the holding of the special election shall be given by publishing the resolution calling the election, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the date of the proposed election in at least one newspaper printed and published in the municipal water district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. The resolution shall also be posted in three public places in the proposed improvement district not less than two weeks prior to the date of the proposed election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72023.

The returns of the special election shall be made, the votes canvassed by the board within seven days following the election, and the results thereof ascertained and declared in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72024.

The secretary, as soon as the result of the special election is declared, shall enter in the records of the board a statement of such results.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72025.

If from the special election returns it appears that a majority of the votes cast at such election were in favor of the formation of the improvement district, the formation of the improvement district shall be complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72026.

No irregularities or informalities in conducting the special election shall invalidate it, if the election has otherwise been fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72027.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the formation of the improvement district or of any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months from the effective date of the resolution of formation, or, if an election is held, within three months from the date of such election; otherwise the formation of the improvement district and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Apportionment of Extraordinary Costs of Water Delivery [72028. - 72028.4.]

72028.

Whenever the board determines that it is necessary to equitably apportion any extraordinary costs of water delivery, including, but not limited to, filtration costs, to the benefited improvement districts within the district, the board shall, by resolution, declare its intent to impose the proportional share of such costs on the improvement districts within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72028.1.

The resolution of intention shall include the nature of the extraordinary costs of water delivery, the amount of the cost which is to be borne by each benefited improvement district, and the calling of a combined election within all of the improvement districts affected on a date to be fixed for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of imposing additional debt on the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72028.2.

The election called by the resolution of intention shall be held in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 71940) of Part 7 of this division for the holding of bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72028.3.

If the majority of the registered voters in all of the combined improvement districts in which the election is held voting on the proposition vote to impose the additional debt on the improvement districts, it shall be imposed; otherwise it shall not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

72028.4.

When additional debt is imposed on improvement districts pursuant to this chapter, the board shall take action at the time and in the manner required by law to require the board of supervisors to levy, in addition to any other tax it levies, a tax upon the property within the affected improvement districts at a rate or rates fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Advance of Funds [72030. - 72031.]

72030.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish the purposes of an improvement district formed pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

72031.

The board may provide that the district shall be repaid for any advance of funds, with interest at a rate not to exceed the interest value of money to the district, from the taxes levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Issuance of Bonds and Payment of Debt Service by the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District [72060. - 72077.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [72060. - 72061.]

72060.

The provisions of this chapter apply only to the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

72061.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, within the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District, bonds may be issued by such district and the debt service thereon paid in and for the purpose and in the manner provided in this chapter. Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, such bonds shall be issued and the debt service thereon paid in and for the purpose and in the manner otherwise provided by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Bond Election, Issuance, and Sale [72062. - 72064.1.]

72062.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, completion, or repair of any or all improvements, works, or property mentioned in this division, the board shall, by resolution, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of the bonds of the district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

72063.

The resolution calling the bond election shall state all of the following:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of bonds.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred by the district, and the initial percentage of the debt service on the debt to be incurred which is to be paid by each improvement district, subject to annual adjustment of such amount pursuant to Water Code Sections 72073 through 72076 hereof.

(c) The full amount of the authorized bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates fixed for the bonds of each series. The maximum term, which the bonds of any series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 40 years from the date of the series.

(d) The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not to exceed 8 percent per year, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year may be payable at the end of that year.

(e) The measure to be submitted to the voters, which measure shall state that the bonds are to be issued and paid for in the manner set forth in this chapter and in the resolution calling the bond election.

(f) The principal of, or interest on, the bonded debt shall be paid from taxes levied and collected in the entire district as provided in Part 9 (commencing with Section 72090) of this division, except to the extent revenues of the district, or revenues raised by the alternative methods provided by this chapter in the improvement districts established pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 72065) of this chapter are sufficient to pay the amount of such principal and interest that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available.

(g) The date upon which an election shall be held for the purpose of authorizing the bonded indebtedness to be incurred.

(h) The designation of precincts and the location of polling places.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 291.)
-------------------------------------------

72064.

If, from the bond election returns, it appears that more than one-half of the votes cast in such election were in favor of, and assented to, the incurring of the indebtedness, the board may, by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized, and may from time to time provide for the issuance of such amounts as the necessity therefor may appear, until the full amount of such bonds authorized has been issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

72064.1.

Except as provided otherwise herein, such election, issuance, and sale of bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Improvement Districts [72065. - 72065.]

72065.

For the purpose of issuing bonds pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, nine improvement districts, the designations and boundaries of which are described as follows, are hereby established upon the authorization of such bonds by the electorate of such district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:
CLAREMONT IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT

Beginning at a point in the Northerly boundary of the Pomona Valley Municipal Water District as same existed on July 1, 1974, said point also being the Southwest corner of the Northeast Quarter of Section 21, T.1N.—R.8W. S.B.B.M.; thence Easterly and Southerly along said District boundary to the point of intersection with the most Southerly boundary of the City of Claremont as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly and Northerly along said corporate boundary to a point of intersection with the center line of Towne Avenue as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence North along said center line to the point of intersection with the center line of Briarcroft Road; thence Westerly along said center line and its Westerly prolongation to its intersection with the center line of the Los Angeles County Flood Control District Thompson Creek Wash Right of Way as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along said center line to the point of intersection with the center line of Baseline Road as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Westerly along said center line of Baseline Road to the point of intersection with the center line of Webb Canyon Road as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly along the center line of Webb Canyon Road to the point of intersection with the North/South center line of Section 32 T.1N.—R.8W. S.B.B.M.; thence Northerly along said center line of Section 32 and Section 29 T.1N.—R.8W. S. B.B.M. to the Northwest corner of the Southwest Quarter of the Northeast Quarter of said Section 29; thence Easterly along the East/West center line of the said Northeast Quarter of Section 29 to the Easterly line of Section 29; thence North to the point of intersection with the Easterly boundary of the Marshall Canyon Regional Park as same existed on July 1, 1974; thence Northerly and Easterly along said boundary to the point of beginning. 
 
LA VERNE IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT